Utah statutes.
61-2c-205.1.   Transition to use of nationwide database.
(1)  An individual not required to be licensed under this chapter as in effect
on December 31, 2010, who is required to be licensed under this chapter as in
effect on January 1, 2011, may not engage in the business of residential
mortgage loans on or after January 1, 2011 without holding a license under
this chapter.
(2)  An individual who applies for a license under this chapter on or after
January 1, 2011, shall meet the requirements of this chapter as in effect on
January 1, 2011.
(3) (a)  This Subsection (3) applies to a licensee who:
(i)  will engage in an activity as a loan originator on or after January 1,
2011; and
(ii)  holds an active license under this chapter on December 31, 2010.
(b)  A licensee shall comply with the requirements of this chapter as in
effect on January 1, 2011, by no later than January 1, 2011, in order to hold
an active license on or after January 1, 2011.
(c)  The license of a licensee that fails to comply with this section on or
before January 1, 2011 becomes inactive on January 1, 2011 until:
(i)  the day on which the licensee complies with the requirements of this
chapter; or
(ii)  the license expires.
(4) (a)  A license of an individual who will engage in an activity as a loan
originator that is inactive on December 31, 2010, terminates as of January 1,
2011 unless that licensee provides on or before January 1, 2011, evidence
satisfactory to the division that the licensee has complied with the
requirements for registration under the nationwide database.
(b)  The division may by rule, made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, proscribe:
(i)  the "requirements for registration under the nationwide database"
described in Subsection (4)(a);
(ii)  the evidence required by this Subsection (4); and
(iii)  the procedure for submitting the evidence required by this Subsection
(4).
(5)  The division may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, providing a process:
(a)  that is consistent with this section to transition the licensing of
individuals engaged in the business of residential mortgage loans to the
license requirements under this chapter as in effect on January 1, 2011; or
(b)  to suspend a requirement for holding a license under this chapter that is
related to the nationwide database if:
(i)  the suspension is related to changes made to Secure and Fair Enforcement
for Mortgage Licensing, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 5105, et seq., on or after January 1,
2009; and
(ii)  the suspension ends on or before December 31, 2011.
(6)  The division may report or provide recommendations to the Legislature
regarding changes, if any, that could be made to this chapter in response to
changes made to the nationwide database or under Secure and Fair Enforcement
for Mortgage Licensing, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 5101, et seq., including changes
related to grandfathering.
